Utah statutes.
70A-2-102.   Scope -- Certain security and other transactions excluded from
this chapter.
Unless the context otherwise requires, this chapter applies to transactions in
goods; it does not apply to any transaction which although in the form of an
unconditional contract to sell or present sale is intended to operate only as
a security transaction nor does this chapter impair or repeal any statute
regulating sales to consumers, farmers or other specified classes of buyers.
